Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-520
Grounds; sale on execution; taxation; partition; exemption.

Lands appropriated and set apart as burial grounds, either for public or private use, and so recorded in the county clerk's office of the county where such lands are situated, shall not be subject to sale on execution on any judgment to be hereafter recovered, to taxation, nor to compulsory partition.

R.S.1866, c. 25, § 53, p. 208;

R.S.1913, § 687;

C.S.1922, § 596;

C.S.1929, § 13-509;

R.S.1943, § 12-520.

Exemption from sale on execution and from taxation does not include special assessments for a public improvement. Greenwood Cemetery v. City of Wayne, 110 Neb. 300, 193 N.W. 734 (1923).

Real estate dedicated as cemetery is exempt from execution though owner receives revenue from sale of lots. First Nat. Bank of Pawnee City v. Hazels, 63 Neb. 844, 89 N.W. 378 (1902).

This section does not exempt proceeds of sale of cemetery lots from being subjected to payment of debt for money borrowed and used to take up purchase money notes. Townsend v. Beatrice Cemetery Assn., 188 F. 1 (8th Cir. 1911).